District of Columbia statutes.
31-3837

Applicability to group health plans.

The provisions of this chapter shall apply to group health benefit plans for years beginning on or after April 3, 2001.

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-254, § 8, 48 DCR 723